Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.440

Penalty.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person who violates any provisions or requirements of this chapter or rules adopted by the director pursuant to this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) A second or subsequent violation is a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2012 c 25 s 3. Prior: 2003 c 326 s 89; 2003 c 53 s 116; 1959 c 107 s 44.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.